California, session 20252026, AB606.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure that out-of-state school counselors, school psychologists, and school social workers have access to clear and equitable pathways for meeting California credentialing requirements while promoting the availability of qualified professionals to address the needs of pupils in the state.SEC. 2. Section 44266 of the Education Code is amended to read:44266. (a) The minimum requirements for the services credential with a specialization in pupil personnel services are a baccalaureate degree or higher degree from a regionally accredited institution of higher education, a fifth year of study, and any specialized and professional preparation that the commission shall require, including (1) completion of a commission-approved program of supervised field experience that includes direct classroom contact, jointly sponsored by a school district and a college or university or (2) a program of professional preparation pursuant to subdivision (d).(b) The services credential with a specialization in pupil personnel services shall authorize the holder to perform, at all grade levels, the pupil personnel service approved by the commission as designated on the credential, which may include, but need not be limited to, school counseling, school psychology, child welfare and attendance services, and school social work.(c) The commission shall continue to issue credentials with a specialization in pupil personnel services under the law as it read on December 31, 1986, for a time period of two years from the effective date of regulations adopted for the issuance of certificates under the new program required by this section, to any candidate in the process of obtaining a services credential with a specialization in pupil personnel services through a previously approved program of study.(d) (1) For a services credential with a specialization in pupil personnel services, the commission may approve a program of professional preparation offered by a local educational agency if the program of professional preparation meets standards of program quality and effectiveness that have been adopted by the commission.(2) For a services credential with a specialization in pupil personnel services in any area other than the area of child welfare and attendance, a program of professional preparation approved pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be in partnership with a regionally accredited institution of higher education.SEC. 3. Section 44266.5 is added to the Education Code, to read:44266.5. (a) (1) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter, the commission shall issue a preliminary professional services credential with a specialization in pupil personnel services to an out-of-state prepared applicant who meets all of the following requirements:(A) Possesses a baccalaureate degree from a regionally accredited institution of higher education.(B) Has earned a valid corresponding pupil personnel services credential specialization in school counseling, school social work, or school psychology, based upon an out-of-state preparation program.(C) Has successfully completed a criminal background check conducted under Sections 44339, 44340, and 44341 for credentialing purposes.(2) A preliminary professional services credential with a specialization in pupil personnel services issued pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be (A) valid for a period of two years and (B) eligible for renewal for a period of no more than two years so long as the credentialholder demonstrates satisfactory progress, as determined by the local educational agency that employs the credentialholder pursuant to the local educational agency’s established criteria.(b) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.